Hawaii statutes.
[§98-3] Applicability. This chapter
applies to all legal material in an electronic record that is designated as
official under section 98-4 and first published electronically on or after [July
1, 2013]. [L 2013, c 11, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next